Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.140

Sole source contracts.

(1) Agencies must submit sole source contracts to the department and make the contracts available for public inspection not fewer than 15 working days before the proposed starting date of the contract. Agencies must provide documented justification for sole source contracts to the department when the contract is submitted, and must include evidence that the agency posted the contract opportunity at a minimum on the state's enterprise vendor registration and bid notification system.

(2) The department must approve sole source contracts before any such contract becomes binding and before any services may be performed or goods provided under the contract. These requirements shall also apply to all sole source contracts except as otherwise exempted by the director.

(3) The director may provide an agency an exemption from the requirements of this section for a contract or contracts. Requests for exemptions must be submitted to the director in writing.

(4) Contracts awarded by institutions of higher education from nonstate funds are exempt from the requirements of this section.

[ 2024 c 140 s 4; 2012 c 224 s 16.]